Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
PART 2 CREATING HOUSING AUTHORITIES
29-4-216. Provisions of bond or mortgage.

In connection with the issuance of bonds or the incurring of any obligation under a lease, and in order to secure the payment of such bonds or obligations, the authority has the power:

To pledge by resolution, trust indenture, mortgage subject to the limitations imposed in this section, or by other contract all or any part of its rents, fees, or revenues;

To covenant against mortgaging all or any part of its property, real or personal, then owned or thereafter acquired or against permitting or suffering any lien thereon;

To covenant with respect to limitations on its right to sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of any project or any part thereof or with respect to limitations on its right to undertake additional projects;

To covenant against pledging all or any part of its rents, fees, and revenues to which its right then exists or the right to which may thereafter come into existence or against permitting or suffering any lien thereon;

To provide for the release of property, rents, fees, and revenues from any pledge or mortgage and to reserve rights and powers in or the right to dispose of property which is subject to a pledge or mortgage;

To covenant as to the bonds to be issued pursuant to any resolution, trust indenture, mortgage, or other instrument and as to the issuance of such bonds in escrow or otherwise and as to the use and disposition of the proceeds thereof;

To covenant as to what other or additional debt may be incurred by it;

To provide for the terms, form, registration, exchange, execution, and authentication of bonds;

To provide for the replacement of lost, destroyed, or mutilated bonds;

To covenant that the authority warrants the title to the premises;

To covenant as to the fees and rentals to be charged, the amount, calculated as may be determined to be raised each year or other period of time by fees, rentals, and other revenues, and as to the use and disposition to be made thereof;

To covenant as to the use of any or all of its property, real or personal;

To create or to authorize the creation of special funds in which there shall be segregated:

The proceeds of any loan or grant;

All of the rents, fees, and revenues of any project or parts thereof;

Any moneys held for the payment of the costs of operation and maintenance of such project or as a reserve for the meeting of contingencies in the operation and maintenance thereof;

Any moneys held for the payment of the principal and interest on its bonds or the sums due under its leases or as a reserve for such payments; and

Any moneys held for any other reserves or contingencies; and to covenant as to the use and disposal of the moneys held in such funds;

To redeem the bonds, to covenant for their redemption, and to provide the terms and conditions thereof;

To covenant against extending the time for the payment of bond interest, directly or indirectly, by any means or in any manner;

To prescribe the procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with bondholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds the holders of which must consent thereto and the manner in which such consent may be given;

To covenant as to the maintenance of its property, the replacement thereof, the insurance to be carried thereon, and the use and disposition of insurance moneys;

To vest in an obligee of the authority the right, in the event of the failure of the authority to observe or perform any covenant on its part, to cure any such default and to advance any moneys necessary for such purpose, and the moneys so advanced may be made an additional obligation of the authority with such interest, security, and priority as may be provided in any trust indenture, mortgage, lease, or contract of the authority with reference thereto;

To covenant and prescribe as to the events of default and terms and conditions upon which any or all of its bonds shall become or may be declared due before maturity and as to the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived;

To covenant as to the rights, liabilities, powers, and duties arising upon the breach by it of any covenant, condition, or obligation;

To covenant to surrender possession of all or any part of any project upon the happening of an event of default, as defined in the trust indenture, mortgage, lease, or contract with reference thereto and to vest in an obligee the right, without judicial proceedings, to take possession and to use, operate, manage, and control such projects or any part thereof, to collect and receive all rents, fees, and revenues arising therefrom in the same manner as the authority itself might do, and to dispose of the moneys collected in accordance with the agreement of the authority with such obligee;

To vest in a trustee the right to enforce any covenant made to secure, to pay, or in relation to the bonds, to provide for the powers and duties of such trustee, to limit liabilities thereof, and to provide the terms and conditions upon which the trustee or the holders of bonds or any proportion of them may enforce any such covenant;

To make covenants other than and in addition to the covenants expressly authorized by this section, of like or different character;

To execute all instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers granted in this section or in the performance of its covenants or duties, which may contain such covenants and provisions, in addition to those above specified, as the government or any purchaser of the bonds of the authority may reasonably require;

To make such covenants and to do all such acts and things as may be necessary, convenient, or desirable in order to secure its bonds, or, in the absolute discretion of the authority, tend to make the bonds more marketable; notwithstanding that such covenants, acts, or things may not be enumerated in this section. It is the intention of this section to give the authority power to do all things in the issuance of bonds, in the provisions for their security that are not inconsistent with the constitution of Colorado, and no consent or approval of any judge or court shall be required thereof; except that the authority shall have no power to mortgage all or any part of its property, real or personal, except as provided in section 29-4-217.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 541, § 16.

CSA:

C. 82, § 44.

CRS 53:

§ 69-3-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-3-16.

29-4-217. Power to mortgage - when.

In connection with any project, the authority also has the power to mortgage all or any part of its property, real or personal, then owned or thereafter acquired, and thereby:

To vest in a government the right, upon the happening of an event of default as defined in such mortgage, to foreclose such mortgage through judicial proceedings or through the exercise of a power of sale without judicial proceedings, so long as a government is the holder of any of the bonds secured by such mortgage;

To vest in a trustee the right, upon the happening of an event of default as defined in such mortgage, to foreclose such mortgage through judicial proceedings or through the exercise of a power of sale without judicial proceedings, but only with the consent of the government, if any, which aided in financing the project involved;

To vest in other obligees the right, but only with the consent of such government, if any, which aided in financing the project involved, to foreclose such mortgage by judicial proceedings;

To vest in an obligee, including a government, the right in foreclosing any mortgage as aforesaid to foreclose such mortgage as to all or such part of the property covered thereby as such obligee, in its absolute discretion, shall elect; such institution, prosecution, and conclusion of any such foreclosure proceedings or the sale of any such parts of the mortgaged property shall not affect in any manner or to any extent the lien of the mortgage on the parts of the mortgaged property not included in such proceedings or not sold.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 545, § 17.

CSA:

C. 82, § 45.

CRS 53:

§ 69-3-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-3-17.

L. 89:

IP(1), (1)(b), and (1)(c) amended, p. 1264, § 3, effective March 21.

29-4-218. Remedies of an obligee of authority.

Any obligee of the authority has the right, in addition to all other rights which may be conferred on such obligee, subject only to any contractual restrictions binding upon such obligee:

By mandamus, suit, action, or proceeding in law or equity, all of which may be joined in one action, to compel the performance by the authority and the commissioners thereof, and any officer, agent, or employee of the authority of each and every term, provision, and covenant contained in any trust indenture, mortgage, lease, or other agreement to which the authority is a party, and to require the carrying out of any or all covenants and agreements and the fulfillment of all duties imposed upon the authority by this part 2;

By suit, action, or proceeding in equity to enjoin any acts or things which may be unlawful or the violation of any of the rights of such obligee of the authority;

By suit, action, or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction to cause possession of any project or any part thereof to be surrendered to any obligee having the right to such possession pursuant to any mortgage, lease, or contract of the authority.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 547, § 18.

CSA:

C. 82, § 46.

CRS 53:

§ 69-3-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-3-18.

29-4-219. Additional remedies.

Any authority has the power, by its trust indenture, mortgage, lease, or other contract, to confer upon any obligee holding or representing a specified amount in bonds, lease, or other obligations the right, upon the happening of an event of default as defined in such instrument:

By suit, action, or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction, to obtain the appointment of a receiver of any project of the authority or any part thereof. If such receiver is appointed, he may enter and take possession of such project or any part thereof and operate and maintain the same, and collect and receive all fees, rents, revenues, or other charges thereafter arising therefrom in the same manner as the authority itself might do, and to keep such moneys in a separate account and apply the same in accordance with the obligations of the authority as the court shall direct.

By suit, action, or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction, to require the authority and the commissioners thereof to account as if they were the trustees of an express trust.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 547, § 19.

CSA:

C. 82, § 47.

CRS 53:

§ 69-3-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-3-19.

29-4-220. Remedies cumulative.

All the rights and remedies conferred by this part 2 are cumulative and in addition to all other rights and remedies that may be conferred upon such obligee of the authority by law or by any agreement with the authority.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 548, § 20.

CSA:

C. 82, § 48.

CRS 53:

§ 69-3-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-3-20.

29-4-221. Limitations on remedies of obligee.

No interest of the authority in any property, real or personal, shall be subject to sale by the foreclosure of a mortgage thereon, either through judicial proceedings or the exercise of a power of sale contained in such mortgage, except in the case of the mortgages provided for in section 29-4-217. All property of the authority is exempt from levy and sale by virtue of an execution, and no execution or other judicial process shall issue against the same. No judgment against the authority shall be a charge or lien upon its property, real or personal. The provisions of this section shall not apply to or limit the rights of obligees to foreclose any mortgage of the authority provided for in section 29-4-217, and, in case of a foreclosure sale thereunder, to obtain a judgment or decree for any deficiency due on the indebtedness secured thereby which was issued on the full faith and credit of the authority. Such deficiency judgment or decree shall be a lien and charge upon the property of the authority which may be levied on and sold by virtue of an execution or other judicial process for the purpose of satisfying such deficiency judgment or decree.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 548, § 21.

CSA:

C. 82, § 49.

CRS 53:

§ 69-3-21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-3-21.

29-4-222. Sale subject to government agreement.

Notwithstanding anything in this part 2 to the contrary, any purchaser at a sale of real or personal property of the authority pursuant to any foreclosure of a mortgage of the authority shall obtain title subject to any contract between the authority and the government relating to the supervision by the government of the operation and maintenance of such property and the construction of improvements thereon.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 549, § 22.

CSA:

C. 82, § 50.

CRS 53:

§ 69-3-22.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-3-22.

29-4-223. Contracts with federal government.

In addition to the powers conferred upon the authority by other provisions of this part 2, the authority is empowered:

To borrow money from the federal government to finance the construction of any project which such authority is authorized by this part 2 to undertake;

To take over any land acquired by the federal government for the construction of a project; and

To take over, lease, or manage any project so constructed or owned by the federal government and, to that end, to enter into any such contracts, mortgages, trust indentures, leases, or other agreements as the federal government may require in such connection.

Such contracts, mortgages, trust indentures, leases, or other agreements may provide that the federal government has the right to supervise and approve the construction, maintenance, and operation of such project.

It is the purpose and intent of this part 2 to authorize such authority to accept the cooperation of the federal government in the construction, maintenance, and operation and in the financing of the construction of any project which the authority is empowered by this part 2 to undertake. Such authority has full power to do all things necessary in order to secure such aid, assistance, and cooperation.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 549, § 23.

CSA:

C. 82, § 51.

CRS 53:

§ 69-3-23.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-3-23.

29-4-224. Wage and labor conditions.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in the housing authorities law or in any other provision of law, any housing authority is empowered to include in any construction contract let in connection with a housing project, as defined in said housing authorities law, stipulations requiring that the contractor and any subcontractors comply with requirements as to minimum wages and maximum hours of labor and with any conditions or regulations which the federal government has imposed as a condition to its financial aid to said housing project.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 670, § 3.

CSA:

C. 82, § 55(1).

CRS 53:

§ 69-3-24.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-3-24.

29-4-225. Insurance.

A housing authority, in addition to its other powers, has the power to procure or agree to the procurement of insurance or guarantees from the federal government for the payment of any debts or parts thereof incurred by said authority, including the power to pay premiums on any such insurance.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 670, § 4.

CSA:

C. 82, § 55(2).

CRS 53:

§ 69-3-25.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-3-25.

29-4-226. Exemption from special assessments.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, the following are exempt from the payment of any special assessments to the state, any county, city and county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state:

A housing authority;

The property of a housing authority;

All property leased to a housing authority; and

The portion of a project that is not used as a store, office, or other commercial facility that is occupied by persons of low income and that is owned by or leased to an entity:

That is wholly owned by an authority;

In which an authority has an ownership interest; or

In which an entity wholly owned by an authority has an ownership interest.

The exemptions from the payment of special assessments set forth in subsection (1) of this section do not preclude a housing authority, the owner of property that is leased to or from a housing authority, or an entity in which an authority has an ownership interest from voluntarily applying to include its eligible real property, as defined in section 32-20-103 (4), into the boundaries of the Colorado new energy improvement district created in section 32-20-104 (1) and accepting the levying by the district of a special assessment, as defined in section 32-20-103 (14), against the eligible real property.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 671, § 5.

CSA:

C. 82, § 55(3).

CRS 53:

§ 69-3-26.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-3-26.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 883, § 8, effective August 2.

L. 2019:

IP(1) amended and (2) added, (HB 19-1272), ch. 358, p. 3288, § 2, effective August 2.

29-4-227. Tax exemptions.

Except for the administrative fees collectible in connection with the inclusion of property within the boundaries of the Colorado new energy improvement district as authorized by section 29-4-226 (2), an authority is exempt from the payment of any taxes or fees to the state or any county, city and county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state. All property of an authority is exempt from all local and municipal taxes. Bonds, notes, debentures, and other evidences of indebtedness of an authority are declared to be issued for a public purpose and to be public instruments, and, together with interest thereon, are exempt from taxes. All property leased to an authority for the purposes of a project is also exempt from taxation, as is the income derived from the authority by the lessor under the lease.

A project that is owned by, leased to, or under construction by an entity that is wholly owned by an authority, an entity in which an authority has an ownership interest, or an entity in which an entity wholly owned by an authority or of which an authority is the sole member has an ownership interest is exempt from both property tax and, during construction, from the payment of sales tax and use tax to the state or any county, city and county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state in proportion to the percentage of the project that is for occupancy by persons of low income. The determination by an authority of the percentage of the project that qualifies for the exemptions from payment of property taxes and sales and use taxes may be made on the basis of either the relative square footage or cost and is presumed valid absent manifest error.

This section, as amended, applies to property owned by or leased to an authority and property owned by, leased to, or under construction by an entity in which an authority has an ownership interest, or an entity in which an entity wholly owned by an authority or of which an authority is the sole member has an ownership interest on or after August 2, 2000. Nothing in this section, as amended, entitles or shall be interpreted to entitle any entity to a refund of taxes from the state for any period beginning before January 1, 2013, or to a refund of taxes from any county, city and county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state paid prior to August 10, 2016. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 39-26-703 (2)(d), C.R.S., from August 10, 2016, until December 31, 2016, an entity may file a claim for a refund of all state taxes overpaid under this section for the period from January 1, 2013, to August 10, 2016. On and after January 1, 2017, all claims for refund under this section are subject to the provisions of section 39-26-703 (2)(d), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 552, § 28.

CSA:

C. 82, § 56.

CRS 53:

§ 69-3-27.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-3-27.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 883, § 9, effective August 2.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (HB 16-1006), ch. 177, p. 609, § 2, effective August 10.

L. 2019:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 19-1272), ch. 358, p. 3289, § 3, effective August 2.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 16-1006, see section 1 of chapter 177, Session Laws of Colorado 2016.

29-4-228. Reports.

The authority shall, at least once a year, file with the mayor of the city a report of its activities for the preceding year and shall make any recommendations with reference to any additional legislation or other action that may be necessary in order to carry out the purposes of this part 2.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 552, § 29.

CSA:

C. 82, § 57.

CRS 53:

§ 69-3-28.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-3-28.

29-4-229. Low rentals.

It is the purpose and intent of this part 2 to authorize and impose a duty on the authority to provide safe and sanitary dwelling accommodations at such rentals that persons of low income can afford to live in such dwelling accommodations. To this end, the authority from time to time shall reduce its rents and other charges for such dwelling accommodations to the extent that it deems such action expedient; but the authority shall not reduce its rents or other charges if such action is in violation of any contract between the authority and an obligee or would result in an insufficiency of revenues from the project to meet the costs of the operation and maintenance thereof, to meet all obligations of the authority as same mature, and to create reasonable reserves for such contingencies as the authority determines.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 552, § 30.

CSA:

C. 82, § 58.

CRS 53:

§ 69-3-29.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-3-29.

29-4-230. Previous housing authorities validated.

The creation and organization of housing authorities pursuant to this part 2 together with all proceedings, acts, and things undertaken, performed, or done prior to May 17, 1939, with reference thereto are validated, ratified, confirmed, approved, and declared legal in all respects, notwithstanding any want of statutory authority or any defect or irregularity therein.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 417, § 1.

CSA:

C. 82, § 59.

CRS 53:

§ 69-3-30.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-3-30.

29-4-231. Contracts and undertakings validated.

All contracts, agreements, obligations, and undertakings of such housing authorities entered into prior to May 17, 1939, relating to financing or aiding in the development, construction, maintenance, or operation of any housing project, or to obtaining aid therefor from the United States housing authority including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, loan and annual contributions contracts with the United States housing authority, agreements with municipalities or other public bodies, including those which are pledged or authorized to be pledged for the protection of the holders of any notes or bonds issued by such housing authorities or which are otherwise made a part of the contract with such holders of notes or bonds relating to cooperation and contributions in aid of housing projects, payments, if any, in lieu of taxes, furnishing of municipal services and facilities, and the elimination of unsafe and unsanitary dwellings, and contracts for the construction of housing projects, together with all proceedings, acts, and things undertaken, performed, or done prior to May 17, 1939, with reference thereto, are validated, ratified, confirmed, approved, and declared legal in all respects, notwithstanding any want of statutory authority or any defect or irregularity therein.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 417, § 2.

CSA:

C. 82, § 60.

CRS 53:

§ 69-3-31.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-3-31.

29-4-232. Notes and bonds validated.

All proceedings, acts, and things undertaken, performed, or done prior to May 17, 1939, in or for the authorization, issuance, execution, and delivery of notes and bonds by housing authorities for the purpose of financing or aiding in the development or construction of a housing project and all notes and bonds issued by housing authorities prior to May 17, 1939, are validated, ratified, confirmed, approved, and declared legal in all respects, notwithstanding any want of statutory authority or any defect or irregularity therein.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 418, § 3.

CSA:

C. 82, § 61.

CRS 53:

§ 69-3-32.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-3-32.